Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB74.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part III of Title 67 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 41AUTISM SCREENINGSec.4101. Definitions.4102. Autism screening.§ 4101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Licensed child care provider." A premises licensed under 55 Pa. Code Ch. 20 (relating to licensure or approval of facilities and agencies) and operating under the requirements of 55 Pa. 12345678910111213141516171819 Code Ch. 3270 (relating to child day care centers) that provides care at any one time for seven or more minors unrelated to the operator.§ 4102. Autism screening.The department shall:(1) Develop an autism screening tool that may be used by a licensed child care provider in this Commonwealth to screen children who are 18 months of age, 24 months of age and 36 months of age in the licensed child care provider's care for autism.(2) Develop and distribute instructions regarding the use of the autism screening tool, including all of the following information:(i) A notice that the autism screening tool should not be construed as a medical diagnosis.(ii) A list of resources pertaining to the diagnosis of autism and applicable services within this Commonwealth.(3) Provide a licensed child care provider with the information under paragraph (2) on an annual basis.(4) Notify a licensed child care provider that the licensed child care provider may review and assist an individual with the use of the autism screening tool if the individual requests assistance, but are not required to provide the assistance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0074PN0062 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526